Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB979.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 71 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART ICOMMONWEALTH AGENCIESChapter1. Preliminary Provisions (Reserved)3. Assessment of Improper PaymentsCHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS(Reserved)CHAPTER 3ASSESSMENT OF IMPROPER PAYMENTS12345678910111213141516171819 Sec.301. Definitions.302. Assessment of improper payments.303. Public information on payments and programs of Commonwealth agencies.§ 301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth agency." A board, commission or department of the executive branch under the policy supervision and jurisdiction of the Governor. The term does not include any of the following:(1) The Treasury Department.(2) The Department of the Auditor General.(3) The Office of Attorney General."Improper payment." A payment that should not have been made by a Commonwealth agency or a contractor with a Commonwealth agency under statutory, contractual, administrative or other legal applicable requirements, including any of the following:(1) An overpayment.(2) An underpayment.(3) A payment to an ineligible recipient.(4) A payment for an ineligible service.(5) A payment for a duplicative or redundant service.(6) A payment for services not received.(7) A payment for goods and services that does not utilize or was not given available discounts."Payment." A payment, including a commitment for a future payment, that is made by a Commonwealth agency or a contractor 20250HB0979PN1062 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with a Commonwealth agency and utilizes Federal or State funds.§ 302. Assessment of improper payments.(a) Assessment.--No less than once every two years, a Commonwealth agency shall conduct an assessment of improper payments on any program which is not required under Federal law. A Commonwealth agency shall conduct an initial assessment of improper payments no later than 120 days after the effective date of this subsection.(b) Contents.--As part of the assessment under subsection (a), a Commonwealth agency shall:(1) Determine whether the programs operated by the Commonwealth agency have a low, moderate or high risk of resulting in improper payments based on each program's total amount of improper payments in dollars and total improper payments as a percentage of each program's total expenditures.(2) Explain the reasons why the programs operated by the Commonwealth have been assessed as having a low, moderate or high risk of resulting in improper payments.(3) Discover and report the root causes of improper payments within high-risk programs.(4) Utilize statistical sampling and extrapolation to calculate an improper payment error rate for high-risk programs.(5) Adopt a corrective action plan to reduce improper payment error rates to no more than 3% for high-risk programs for the next occurring biennial assessment.(c) Copies.--A Commonwealth agency shall provide an electronic copy of the assessment under subsection (a) to all of the following:20250HB0979PN1062 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The Secretary of the Budget.(2) The Office of the Inspector General . (3) The Department of the Auditor General.(4) The Independent Fiscal Office.(5) Members of the General Assembly.§ 303. Public information on payments and programs of Commonwealth agencies.The Office of the Budget shall maintain a publicly accessible Internet website and update the website to inform the public of, at a minimum, all of the following information:(1) Each Commonwealth agency's biennial improper payment assessments.(2) Each Commonwealth agency's total improper payments in dollar value and total improper payment error rate.(3) Each Commonwealth agency's high-risk program, the dollar value of improper payments for each high-risk program and the improper payment error rate percentage for each high-risk program.(4) Each Commonwealth agency's high-risk program corrective action plan and a summary status of completing the corrective action plan.(5) The recovery of improper payments for each program in total dollars and by percentage.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB0979PN1062 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324